src/fst/morphology/affixes/noun_to_verb.lexc
LEXICON Z1_noZ_verbalizers
+GASAAR+Der/nv:%>gasaar IV_long_stem ;
+GE+Der/nv:%>g2 HTR_schwa_SAQ_nnip ;
+GIP+Der/nv:%>g2ip XIiXmorf_stem ;
+GISSAAR+Der/nv:%>g2issaar IV_r_stem ;
+GIIP@U.Num.Pl@+Der/nv:%>g2iip@U.Num.Pl@ XIiXmorf_stem ;
+IAR+Der/nv:^T%>iar HTR_r_GAQ_i ;
+IRNIAR+Der/nv+Gram/IV:^T%>erniar IV_r ; ! +IR+Der/nv+NIAR+Der/vv
+IRSIR+Der/nv:^T%>erser XIirXmorf_stem ;
+IRUTE+Der/nv:^T%>erup XIuteXmorf ;
+IRUTE+Der/nv:^T%>erup HTR_UTE_SSAQ_ssi ;
+KIP+Der/nv:^T%>kip XItsXmorf_stem ;
+KKAAR@U.ObjNum.Pl@+Der/nv:^T%>kkaar@U.ObjNum.Pl@ HTR_longV_GAQ_addi ;
+KKUMINAR+Der/nv:^T%>kkuminar IV_r_stem ;
+LIAR+Der/nv+Gram/IV:^T%>liar IV_r_UTE_gennemgang ;
+LIR+Der/nv:^T%>ler lir_iv ; !XIirXmorf_stem
+LIR+Der/nv:^T%>ler lir_tv ; ! HTR_ir_GAQ_i
+LIRNGUSAATE@U.Num.Pl@+Der/nv+Gram/Reci:^T%>lerngusaap@U.Num.Pl@ XIuteXmorf ;
+LIRI+Der/nv:^T%>leri XIi_voqXmorf ;
+LIRSUR+Der/nv@U.lirsur.ON@@U.vip.OFF@:@U.lirsur.ON@@U.vip.OFF@^T%>lersor TV_UTE_gennemgang ;
+LIRSUR+Der/nv+Gram/IV:^T%>lersor IV_r_UTE_gennemgang ;
+LISAAR+Der/nv:^T%>lisaar IV_r_stem ;
+LISAAR+Der/nv+UTE+Der/vv@U.saar.OFF@:@U.saar.OFF@^T%>lisaarup HTR_UTE_SSAQ_ssi ;
+LISAR+Der/nv:^T%>lisar IV_r_stem ;
+LIUR+Der/nv:^T%>lior IV_r_stem ;
+LIUR+Der/nv+UTE+Der/vv@U.saar.OFF@:@U.saar.OFF@^T%>liuup HTR_UTE_SSAQ_ssi ;
+LIUTE+Der/nv:^T%>liup HTR_UTE_SSAQ_ssi ;
+LUP+Der/nv:%>lup IV_k_stem ;
+NIP+Der/nv:^T%>nip IV_k ;
+NNGUR+Der/nv+Gram/IV:^T%>nngor IV_r_UTE_gennemgang ; !PL 20180201 Nyt gennemgangskatalog
+NNGUR+Der/nv:^T%>nngor HTR_r_GAQ_i ;
+NNGUR+Der/nv+SAR+Der/vv:^T%>nngorsar DOTR_IV_r ;
+PALAAR+Der/nv:^T%>rpalaar IV_r_stem ;
+PALLAP+Der/nv:^T%>rpallap IV_k ;
+PALUP+Der/nv:^T%>rpalup IV_k ;
+QAR+Der/nv:^T%>qar IV_r_stem ;
+SI+Der/nv:%>si XIi_voqXmorf ;
+SIUR+Der/nv:%>sior IV_r_stem ;
+SIUR+Der/nv+UTE+Der/vv@U.saar.OFF@:@U.saar.OFF@%>siuup HTR_UTE_SSAQ_ssi ;
+SUNNIP+Der/nv:%>sunnip IV_k ;
+SUNNIP+Der/nv:%>sunnip XItsX ;
+SSAQQIP+Der/nv:^T%>ssaqqip XIiXmorf_stem ;
!+SSIP+Der/nv:^T%>ssip HTR_iC_TAQ_i ;
!+SSIP+Der/nv:^T%>ssip IV_k ;
+TAAR+Der/nv:%>taar IV_r_stem ;
+TU+Der/nv:%>tu IV_voq_stem ;
+TUR+Der/nv:%>tor IV_r_stem ;
+U+Der/nv:^T%>u copula_nv ; !IV_voq
+USAAR+Der/nv@U.usaar.ON@:@U.usaar.ON@^T%>usaar IV_r_stem ;


LEXICON Z1nujaqZ_verbalizers
+GASAAR+Der/nv:%>jarasaar IV_long_stem ;
+GE+Der/nv:%>jar HTR_schwa_SAQ_nnip ;
+GIP+Der/nv:%>jagip XIiXmorf ;
+GISSAAR+Der/nv:%>jagissaar IV_r_stem ;
@U.Num.Pl@+GIIP+Der/nv:@U.Num.Pl@%>jagiip XIiXmorf_stem ;
+IAR+Der/nv:%>jaajar HTR_r_GAQ_i ;
+IRNIAR+Der/nv+Gram/IV:%>jaarniar IV_r ; ! +IR+Der/nv+NIAR+Der/vv
+IRSIR+Der/nv:%>jaarser XIirXmorf_stem ;
+IRUTE+Der/nv:%>jaarup XIuteXmorf ;
+IRUTE+Der/nv:%>jaarup HTR_UTE_SSAQ_ssi ;
+KIP+Der/nv:%>jakip XItsXmorf_stem ;
+KKAAR@U.ObjNum.Pl@+Der/nv:%>jakkaar@U.ObjNum.Pl@ HTR_longV_GAQ_addi ;
+KKUMINAR+Der/nv:%>jakkuminar IV_r_stem ;
+LIAR+Der/nv+Gram/IV:%>jaliar IV_r_UTE_gennemgang ;
+LIR+Der/nv:%>jaler lir_iv ; !XIirXmorf_stem
+LIR+Der/nv:%>jaler lir_tv ; !HTR_ir_GAQ_i
+LIRNGUSAATE@U.Num.Pl@+Der/nv+Gram/Reci:%>jalerngusaap@U.Num.Pl@ XIuteXmorf ;
+LIRI+Der/nv:%>jaleri XIi_voqXmorf ;
+LIRSUR+Der/nv@U.lirsur.ON@@U.vip.OFF@:@U.lirsur.ON@@U.vip.OFF@%>jalersor TV_UTE_gennemgang ;
+LIRSUR+Der/nv+Gram/IV:%>jalersor IV_r_UTE_gennemgang ;
+LISAAR+Der/nv:%>jalisaar IV_r_stem ;
+LISAAR+Der/nv+UTE+Der/vv@U.saar.OFF@:@U.saar.OFF@%>jalisaarup HTR_UTE_SSAQ_ssi ;
+LISAR+Der/nv:%>jalisar IV_r_stem ;
+LIUR+Der/nv:%>jalior IV_r_stem ;
+LIUR+Der/nv+UTE+Der/vv@U.saar.OFF@:@U.saar.OFF@%>jaliuup HTR_UTE_SSAQ_ssi ;
+LIUTE+Der/nv:%>jaliup HTR_UTE_SSAQ_ssi ;
+LUP+Der/nv:%>jalup IV_k_stem ;
+NIP+Der/nv:%>janip IV_k ;
+NNGUR+Der/nv+Gram/IV:%>janngor IV_r_UTE_gennemgang ; !PL 20180201 Nyt gennemgangskatalog
+NNGUR+Der/nv:%>janngor HTR_r_GAQ_i ;
+PALAAR+Der/nv:%>jarpalaar IV_r_stem ;
+PALLAP+Der/nv:%>jarpallap IV_k ;
+PALUP+Der/nv:%>jarpalup IV_k ;
+QAR+Der/nv:%>jaqar IV_r_stem ;
+SI+Der/nv:%>jarsi XIi_voqXmorf ;
+SIUR+Der/nv:%>jarsior IV_r_stem ;
+SIUR+Der/nv+UTE+Der/vv@U.saar.OFF@:@U.saar.OFF@%>jarsiuup HTR_UTE_SSAQ_ssi ;
+SUNNIP+Der/nv:%>jarsunnip IV_k ;
+SUNNIP+Der/nv:%>jarsunnip XItsX ;
+SSAQQIP+Der/nv:%>jassaqqip XIiXmorf_stem ;
!+SSIP+Der/nv:%>jassip HTR_iC_TAQ_i ;
!+SSIP+Der/nv:%>jassip IV_k ;
+TAAR+Der/nv:%>jartaar IV_r_stem ;
+TU+Der/nv:%>jartu IV_voq_stem ;
+TUR+Der/nv:%>jartor IV_r_stem ;
+U+Der/nv:%>jaa copula_nv ; !IV_voq
+USAAR+Der/nv@U.usaar.ON@:@U.usaar.ON@%>jaasaar IV_r_stem ;

LEXICON Z1joqZ_verbalizers
+GASAAR+Der/nv:%>jorasaar IV_long_stem ;
+GE+Der/nv:%>jor HTR_schwa_SAQ_nnip ;
+GIP+Der/nv:%>jugip XIiXmorf ;
+GISSAAR+Der/nv:%>jugissaar IV_r_stem ;
@U.Num.Pl@+GIIP+Der/nv:@U.Num.Pl@%>jugiip XIiXmorf_stem ;
+IAR+Der/nv:%>juiar HTR_r_GAQ_i ;
+IRNIAR+Der/nv+Gram/IV:%>joorniar IV_r ; ! +IR+Der/nv+NIAR+Der/vv
+IRSIR+Der/nv:%>joorser XIirXmorf_stem ;
+IRUTE+Der/nv:%>juerup XIuteXmorf ;
+IRUTE+Der/nv:%>juerup HTR_UTE_SSAQ_ssi ;
+KIP+Der/nv:%>jukip XItsXmorf_stem ;
+KKAAR@U.ObjNum.Pl@+Der/nv:%>jukkaar@U.ObjNum.Pl@ HTR_longV_GAQ_addi ;
+KKUMINAR+Der/nv:%>jukkuminar IV_r_stem ;
+LIAR+Der/nv+Gram/IV:%>juliar IV_r_UTE_gennemgang ;
+LIR+Der/nv:%>juler lir_iv ; !XIirXmorf_stem
+LIR+Der/nv:%>juler lir_tv ; !HTR_ir_GAQ_i
+LIRNGUSAATE@U.Num.Pl@+Der/nv+Gram/Reci:%>julerngusaap@U.Num.Pl@ XIuteXmorf ;
+LIRI+Der/nv:%>juleri XIi_voqXmorf ;
+LIRSUR+Der/nv@U.lirsur.ON@@U.vip.OFF@:@U.lirsur.ON@@U.vip.OFF@%>julersor TV_UTE_gennemgang ;
+LIRSUR+Der/nv+Gram/IV:%>julersor IV_r_UTE_gennemgang ;
+LISAAR+Der/nv:%>julisaar IV_r_stem ;
+LISAAR+Der/nv+UTE+Der/vv@U.saar.OFF@:@U.saar.OFF@%>julisaarup HTR_UTE_SSAQ_ssi ;
+LISAR+Der/nv:%>julisar IV_r_stem ;
+LIUR+Der/nv:ju^T%>lior IV_r_stem ;
+LIUR+Der/nv+UTE+Der/vv@U.saar.OFF@:@U.saar.OFF@ju^T%>liuup HTR_UTE_SSAQ_ssi ;
+LIUTE+Der/nv:ju^T%>liup HTR_UTE_SSAQ_ssi ;
+LUP+Der/nv:%>julup IV_k_stem ;
+NIP+Der/nv:%>junip IV_k ;
+NNGIR+Der/nv:%>junnger XIirXmorf_stem ; !livm 20171211
+NNGUR+Der/nv+Gram/IV:%>junngor IV_r_UTE_gennemgang ; !PL 20180201 Nyt gennemgangskatalog
+NNGUR+Der/nv:%>junngor HTR_r_GAQ_i ;
+PALAAR+Der/nv:%>jorpalaar IV_r_stem ;
+PALLAP+Der/nv:%>jorpallap IV_k ;
+PALUP+Der/nv:%>jorpalup IV_k ;
+QAR+Der/nv:%>joqar IV_r_stem ;
+SI+Der/nv:%>jorsi XIi_voqXmorf ;
+SIUR+Der/nv:%>jorsior IV_r_stem ;
+SIUR+Der/nv+UTE+Der/vv@U.saar.OFF@:@U.saar.OFF@%>jorsiuup HTR_UTE_SSAQ_ssi ;
+SUNNIP+Der/nv:%>jorsunnip IV_k ;
+SUNNIP+Der/nv:%>jorsunnip XItsX ;
+SSAQQIP+Der/nv:%>jussaqqip XIiXmorf_stem ;
!+SSIP+Der/nv:%>jussip HTR_iC_TAQ_i ;
!+SSIP+Der/nv:%>jussip IV_k ;
+TAAR+Der/nv:%>jortaar IV_r_stem ;
+TU+Der/nv:%>jortu IV_voq_stem ;
+TUR+Der/nv:%>jortor IV_r_stem ;
+U+Der/nv:%>juu copula_nv ; !IV_voq
+USAAR+Der/nv@U.usaar.ON@:@U.usaar.ON@%>juusaar IV_r_stem ;

LEXICON Z1_ngaZ_verbalizers
+GASAAR+Der/nv:%>garasaar IV_long_stem ;
+GE+Der/nv:%>gar HTR_schwa_SAQ_nnip ;
+GIP+Der/nv:%>gagip XIiXmorf ;
+GISSAAR+Der/nv:%>gagissaar IV_r_stem ;
@U.Num.Pl@+GIIP+Der/nv:@U.Num.Pl@%>gagiip XIiXmorf_stem ;
+IAR+Der/nv:%>gaajar HTR_r_GAQ_i ;
+IRNIAR+Der/nv+Gram/IV:%>gaarniar IV_r ; ! +IR+Der/nv+NIAR+Der/vv
+IRSIR+Der/nv:%>gaarser XIirXmorf_stem ;
+IRUTE+Der/nv:%>gaarup XIuteXmorf ;
+IRUTE+Der/nv:%>gaarup HTR_UTE_SSAQ_ssi ;
+KIP+Der/nv:%>gakip XItsXmorf_stem ;
+KKAAR@U.ObjNum.Pl@+Der/nv:%>gakkaar@U.ObjNum.Pl@ HTR_longV_GAQ_addi ;
+KKUMINAR+Der/nv:%>gakkuminar IV_r_stem ;
+LIR+Der/nv:gaq^T%>ler XIirXmorf_stem ;
+LIR+Der/nv:gaq^T%>ler HTR_ir_GAQ_i ;
+LIRNGUSAATE@U.Num.Pl@+Der/nv+Gram/Reci:%>galerngusaap@U.Num.Pl@ XIuteXmorf ;
+LIRI+Der/nv:gaq^T%>leri XIi_voqXmorf ;
+LIRSUR+Der/nv@U.lirsur.ON@@U.vip.OFF@:@U.lirsur.ON@@U.vip.OFF@gaq^T%>lersor TV_UTE_gennemgang ;
+LIRSUR+Der/nv+Gram/IV:gaq^T%>lersor IV_r_UTE_gennemgang ;
+LISAAR+Der/nv:%>galisaar IV_r_stem ;
+LISAAR+Der/nv+UTE+Der/vv@U.saar.OFF@:@U.saar.OFF@%>galisaarup HTR_UTE_SSAQ_ssi ;
+LISAR+Der/nv:%>galisar IV_r_stem ;
+LIUR+Der/nv:ga^T%>lior IV_r_stem ;
+LIUR+Der/nv+UTE+Der/vv@U.saar.OFF@:@U.saar.OFF@ga^T%>liuup HTR_UTE_SSAQ_ssi ;
+LIUTE+Der/nv:ga^T%>liup HTR_UTE_SSAQ_ssi ;
+LUP+Der/nv:%>galup IV_k_stem ;
+NIP+Der/nv:%>ganip IV_k ;
+NNGUR+Der/nv+Gram/IV:%>ganngor IV_r_UTE_gennemgang ; !PL 20180201 Nyt gennemgangskatalog
+NNGUR+Der/nv:%>ganngor HTR_r_GAQ_i ;
+PALAAR+Der/nv:%>garpalaar IV_r_stem ;
+PALLAP+Der/nv:%>garpallap IV_k ;
+PALUP+Der/nv:%>garpalup IV_k ;
+QAR+Der/nv:%>gaqar IV_r_stem ;
+SI+Der/nv:%>garsi XIi_voqXmorf ;
+SIUR+Der/nv:%>garsior IV_r_stem ;
+SIUR+Der/nv+UTE+Der/vv@U.saar.OFF@:@U.saar.OFF@%>garsiuup HTR_UTE_SSAQ_ssi ;
+SUNNIP+Der/nv:%>garsunnip IV_k ;
+SUNNIP+Der/nv:%>garsunnip XItsX ;
+SSAQQIP+Der/nv:%>gassaqqip XIiXmorf_stem ;
!+SSIP+Der/nv:%>gassip HTR_iC_TAQ_i ;
!+SSIP+Der/nv:%>gassip IV_k ;
+TAAR+Der/nv:%>gartaar IV_r_stem ;
+TU+Der/nv:%>gartu IV_voq_stem ;
+TUR+Der/nv:%>gartor IV_r_stem ;
+U+Der/nv:%>gaa copula_nv ; !IV_voq
+USAAR+Der/nv@U.usaar.ON@:@U.usaar.ON@%>guusaar IV_r_stem ;


LEXICON Z1_ngeZ_verbalizers
+GASAAR+Der/nv:%>gerasaar IV_long_stem ;
+GE+Der/nv:%>gig HTR_schwa_SAQ_nnip ;
+GIP+Der/nv:%>gigip XIiXmorf ;
+GISSAAR+Der/nv:%>gigissaar IV_r_stem ;
@U.Num.Pl@+GIIP+Der/nv:@U.Num.Pl@%>gigiip XIiXmorf_stem ;
+IAR+Der/nv:%>giiar HTR_r_GAQ_i ;
+IRNIAR+Der/nv+Gram/IV:%>geerniar IV_r ; ! +IR+Der/nv+NIAR+Der/vv
+IRSIR+Der/nv:%>geerser XIirXmorf_stem ;
+IRUTE+Der/nv:%>geerup XIuteXmorf ;
+IRUTE+Der/nv:%>geerup HTR_UTE_SSAQ_ssi ;
+KIP+Der/nv:%>gikip XItsXmorf_stem ;
+KKAAR@U.ObjNum.Pl@+Der/nv:%>gikkaar@U.ObjNum.Pl@ HTR_longV_GAQ_addi ;
+KKUMINAR+Der/nv:%>gikkuminar IV_r_stem ;
+LIR+Der/nv:gaq%>giler XIirXmorf_stem ;
+LIR+Der/nv:gaq%>giler HTR_ir_GAQ_i ;
+LIRNGUSAATE@U.Num.Pl@+Der/nv+Gram/Reci:%>gilerngusaap@U.Num.Pl@ XIuteXmorf ;
+LIRI+Der/nv:gaq%>gileri XIi_voqXmorf ;
+LIRSUR+Der/nv@U.lirsur.ON@@U.vip.OFF@:@U.lirsur.ON@@U.vip.OFF@gaq%>gilersor TV_UTE_gennemgang ;
+LIRSUR+Der/nv+Gram/IV:gaq%>gilersor IV_r_UTE_gennemgang ;
+LISAAR+Der/nv:%>gilisaar IV_r_stem ;
+LISAAR+Der/nv+UTE+Der/vv@U.saar.OFF@:@U.saar.OFF@%>gilisaarup HTR_UTE_SSAQ_ssi ;
+LISAR+Der/nv:%>gilisar IV_r_stem ;
+LIUR+Der/nv:ga%>gilior IV_r_stem ;
+LIUR+Der/nv+UTE+Der/vv@U.saar.OFF@:@U.saar.OFF@ga%>giliuup HTR_UTE_SSAQ_ssi ;
+LIUTE+Der/nv:ga%>giliup HTR_UTE_SSAQ_ssi ;
+LUP+Der/nv:%>gilup IV_k_stem ;
+NIP+Der/nv:%>ginip IV_k ;
+NNGUR+Der/nv+Gram/IV:%>ginngor IV_r_UTE_gennemgang ; !PL 20180201 Nyt gennemgangskatalog
+NNGUR+Der/nv:%>ginngor HTR_r_GAQ_i ;
+PALAAR+Der/nv:%>gerpalaar IV_r_stem ;
+PALLAP+Der/nv:%>gerpallap IV_k ;
+PALUP+Der/nv:%>gerpalup IV_k ;
+QAR+Der/nv:%>geqar IV_r_stem ;
+SI+Der/nv:%>gersi XIi_voqXmorf ;
+SIUR+Der/nv:%>gersior IV_r_stem ;
+SIUR+Der/nv+UTE+Der/vv@U.saar.OFF@:@U.saar.OFF@%>gersiuup HTR_UTE_SSAQ_ssi ;
+SUNNIP+Der/nv:%>gersunnip IV_k ;
+SUNNIP+Der/nv:%>gersunnip XItsX ;
+SSAQQIP+Der/nv:%>gissaqqip XIiXmorf_stem ;
!+SSIP+Der/nv:%>gissip HTR_iC_TAQ_i ;
!+SSIP+Der/nv:%>gissip IV_k ;
+TAAR+Der/nv:%>gertaar IV_r_stem ;
+TU+Der/nv:%>gertu IV_voq_stem ;
+TUR+Der/nv:%>gertor IV_r_stem ;
+U+Der/nv:%>giu copula_nv ; !IV_voq
+USAAR+Der/nv@U.usaar.ON@:@U.usaar.ON@%>giusaar IV_r_stem ;
